California statutes. Education Code
(b) Disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions are, for all job-related purposes, temporary disabilities, and shall be treated as such under any health or temporary disability insurance or sick leave plan available in connection with employment by a community college district.

(c) Except as
 provided in this section, written and unwritten employment policies and practices of a community college district shall be applied to disability due to pregnancy or childbirth on the same terms and conditions applied to other temporary disabilities.

(d) Except as provided in this section, there are no eligibility requirements, including, but not limited to, minimum hours worked or length of service, before an employee disabled by pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or related medical conditions is eligible for a paid leave of absence under this section.

(e) A community college district that has elected to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code pursuant to Section 710.4 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may apply the disability benefits of an employee under Part 2 (commencing with Section
 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code in partial satisfaction of the requirements of this section. Full satisfaction of the requirements of this section is met if the employer ensures that the employee receives the full amount of pay during the leave of absence required by this section without a reduction to the vacation, sick, or other compensated leave time balances of the employee.

(f) This section shall apply to community college districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the obligation of a community college district to comply with any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a community college district and an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section
 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code that provides greater disability or parental leave rights to employees than the rights established under this section.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 26) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 27.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

88194.

Every person employed in the classified service of any community college district shall be granted necessary leave of absence, not to exceed three days, or five days if out-of-state travel is required, on account of the death of any member of his or her immediate family. No deduction shall be made from the salary of the employee nor shall such leave be deducted from leave granted by other sections of this code or provided by the governing board of the district. The governing board may enlarge the benefits of this section and may expand the class of relatives listed below as members of the immediate family. “Members of the immediate family,” as used in this section, means the mother, father, grandmother, grandfather, or a grandchild of the employee or of the spouse of the employee, and the spouse, son, son-in-law, daughter, daughter-in-law, brother, or sister of the employee, or any relative living in the immediate household of the employee.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 232.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88195.

A permanent employee of the classified service who has exhausted all entitlement to sick leave, vacation, compensatory overtime, or other available paid leave and who is absent because of nonindustrial accident or illness may be granted additional leave, paid or unpaid, not to exceed six months. The board may renew the leave of absence, paid or unpaid, for two additional six-month periods or lesser leave periods that it may provide but not to exceed a total of 18 months.

An employee, upon ability to resume the duties of a position within the class to which he or she was assigned, may do so at any time during the leaves of absence granted under this section and time lost shall not be considered a break in service. The employee shall be restored to a position within the class to which he or she was assigned and, if at all possible, to his or her position with all the rights, benefits and burdens of a permanent employee.

If, at the conclusion of all leaves of absence, paid or unpaid, the employee is still unable to assume the duties of his or her position, the employee shall be placed on a reemployment list for a period of 39 months.

At any time during the prescribed 39 months that the employee is able to assume the duties of his or her position, the employee shall be reemployed in the first vacancy in the classification of his or her previous assignment. The employee’s reemployment shall take preference over all other applicants except for those laid off for lack of work or funds under Section 88117 in which case the employee shall be ranked according to his or her proper seniority. Upon resumption of the employee’s duties, the break in service will be disregarded and the employee shall be fully restored as a permanent employee.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 233.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88196.

When a person employed in the classified service is absent from his or her duties on account of illness or accident for a period of five months or less, whether or not the absence arises out of or in the course of employment of the employee, the amount deducted from the salary due the employee for any month in which the absence occurs shall not exceed the sum which is actually paid a substitute employee employed to fill the employee’s position during his or her absence.

Except in a district where the governing board has adopted a salary schedule for substitute employees of the district, the amount paid the substitute employee during any month shall be less than the salary due the employee absent from the employee’s duties.

Entitlement to sick leave provisions under this section, if any, shall be considered “entitlement to other sick leave” for the purposes of computing benefits under Section 88192 if the absence is for industrial accident or illness and shall be used after entitlement to all regular sick leave, accumulated compensating time, vacation or other available paid leave has been exhausted.

This section shall not apply to any community college district that adopts and maintains, in effect, a rule which provides that a regular classified employee shall be credited once a year with a total of not less than 100 working days of paid sick leave, including days to which he or she is entitled under Section 88191. These days of paid sick leave, in addition to those required by Section 88191, shall be compensated at not less than 50 percent of the employee’s regular salary. The paid sick leave authorized under such a rule shall be exclusive of any other paid leave, holidays, vacation, or compensating time to which the employee may be entitled. Nothing in this section shall preclude the governing board from adopting such a rule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 234.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88196.1.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, during each school year, a classified employee may use his or her sick leave for purposes of parental leave for a period of up to 12 workweeks.

(2) In the community college districts that use the differential pay system described in the first paragraph of Section 88196, when an employee has exhausted all available sick leave, including all accumulated sick leave, and continues to be absent from his or her duties on account of parental leave pursuant to
 Section 12945.2 of the Government Code, the amount deducted from the salary due him or her for any of the remaining portion of the 12-workweek period in which the absence occurs shall not exceed the sum that is actually paid a substitute employee employed to fill his or her position during his or her absence.

(3) In community college districts that use the differential pay system described in the last paragraph of Section 88196, when an employee has exhausted all available sick leave, including all accumulated sick leave, and continues to be absent from his or her duties on account of parental leave pursuant to Section 12945.2 of the Government Code, the employee shall be compensated at no less than 50 percent of the employee’s regular salary for the remaining portion of the 12-workweek period of parental leave.

(4) Regardless of the type of differential pay system used by the community college district pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3), the compensation a classified employee shall receive shall be no less than 50 percent of his or her regular salary for the remaining portion of the 12-workweek period of parental leave.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), all of the following apply:

(1) The 12-workweek period of parental leave shall be reduced by any period of sick leave, including accumulated sick leave, taken during a period of parental leave.

(2) An employee shall not be provided more than one 12-workweek period for parental leave during any 12-month period.

(3) Parental leave taken pursuant to this section shall run concurrently with parental leave taken pursuant to Section 12945.2 of the Government Code. The aggregate amount of parental leave taken pursuant to this section and Section 12945.2 of the Government Code shall not exceed 12 workweeks in a 12-month
 period.

(c) This section shall be applicable whether or not the absence from duty is by reason of a leave of absence granted by the governing board of the employing community college district.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 12945.2 of the Government Code, a classified employee is not required to have 1,250 hours of service with the employer during the previous 12-month period in order to take parental leave pursuant to this section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the obligation of a public school employer to comply with any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to Chapter
 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code that provides greater parental
 leave rights to employees than the rights established under this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, “parental leave” means leave for reason of the birth of a child of the employee, or the placement of a child with an employee in connection with the adoption or foster care of the child by the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 994, Sec. 4.   (AB 2012)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

88196.5.

A community college district may deduct from the salary otherwise payable to an employee under Section 88196 an amount which is payable, in lieu of salary and on account of the absence for illness or accident, to the employee as the beneficiary under a policy of insurance purchased by the district.

This section shall not be applicable unless specifically included in a collective bargaining agreement between the exclusive representative and the school employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 323.)
-------------------------------------------

88197.

(a) Every community college district shall grant to regular classified employees an annual vacation at the regular rate of pay earned at the time the vacation is commenced. The vacation shall be as determined by the community college district, but shall be not less than five-sixths of a day for each month in which the employee is in a paid status for more than one-half the working days in the month, if the employee is regularly employed five days per week, seven to eight hours a day. An employee in a paid status for less than one-half the working days in a month shall have his or her vacation credit accrued on the basis provided for in subdivision (b) or (c).

(b) In lieu of accrual of vacation credit on a monthly basis and proration as prescribed in subdivision (a), a district may provide for accrual of vacation credit on any of the following bases:

(1) For all employees or classes of employees who work a full workweek of 40 hours, the district shall provide 0.03846 hour of vacation credit for each hour of paid service, not including overtime.

(2) For all employees or classes of employees who work a full workweek of 37.5 hours, the district shall provide 0.04087 hour of vacation credit for each hour of paid service, not including overtime.

(3) For all employees or classes of employees who work a full workweek of 35 hours, the district shall provide 0.04379 hour of vacation credit for each hour of paid service, not including overtime.

(c) For all employees regularly employed for fewer than 35 hours a week, regardless of the number of hours or days worked per week, the vacation credit shall be computed at the rate of 0.03846 for each hour the employee is in paid status, not including overtime.

(d) Vacation, with the approval of the employer, may be taken at any time during the college year. If the employee is not permitted to take his or her full annual vacation, the amount not taken shall accumulate for use in the next year or be paid for in cash at the option of the governing board.

(e) Earned vacation shall not become a vested right until completion of the initial six months of employment.

(f) The employee may be granted vacation during the college year even though not earned at the time the vacation is taken.

(g) If an employee is terminated and had been granted vacation which was not yet earned at the time of termination of his or her services, the employer shall deduct from the employee’s severance check the full amount of salary which was paid for such unearned days of vacation taken.

(h) Upon separation from service, the employee shall be entitled to lump-sum compensation for all earned and unused vacation, except that employees who have not completed six months of employment in regular status shall not be entitled to such compensation.

(i) This section shall not apply to substitute, short-term, or limited-term employees, as defined in Sections 88003 and 88105, unless those employees are specifically included by the district.

(j) The district may expand the benefits provided for in this section.

(k) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 235.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88198.

When any provision of this code expressly authorizes or requires the governing board of a community college district to grant a leave of absence for any purpose or for any period of time to persons employed in classified positions, that express authorization or requirement shall not deprive the governing board of the power to grant leaves of absence with or without pay to those employees for other purposes or for other periods of time, so long as the governing board does not deprive any employee of any leave of absence to which he or she is entitled by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 236.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88199.

Governing boards of community college districts may grant leaves of absence to persons employed in nonacademic positions, and at their discretion may pay compensation at the rate the board prescribes, during the absence, to any employee whose absence is caused by accident or illness, whether or not the absence arises out of or in the course of the employment of the employee, or because of quarantine which results from his or her contact with other persons having a contagious disease while performing his or her duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 198.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88200.

Governing boards of community college districts may allow permanent classified employees to interrupt or terminate vacation leave in order to begin another type of paid leave without a return to active service, provided the employee supplies adequate notice and relevant supporting information regarding the basis for such interruption or termination.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88201.

The governing boards of any community college district may accept the resignation of any employee and may fix the time when the resignation shall take effect, which shall not be later than the close of the school year during which the resignation is received by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88202.

Any classified employee of a community college district, school district, or county superintendent of schools who has been employed for a period of one calendar year or more whose employment is terminated for reasons other than action initiated by the employer for cause and who subsequently accepts employment with a community college district or county superintendent of schools within one year of the termination of his or her former employment, shall have transferred with him or her to the employing community college district or county superintendent of schools the total amount of earned leave of absence for illness or injury to which he or she is entitled under Section 45191 or 88191. This transfer shall be in the same manner as is provided for academic employees.

In any case where an employee was terminated as a result of action initiated by the employer for cause, the transfer may be made if agreed to by the governing board of the community college district or the county superintendent of schools newly employing the employee.

All or any part of the previous service, not separated by a break in service greater than one year as of the last day of paid service, may, if agreed to by the employing entity, be construed to have been served in the employing community college district or county superintendent of schools of employment for seniority purposes, except that the previous service may not be counted, for seniority purposes, when position or personnel reduction is ordered, for any reason, by the board.

No governing board of a community college district shall adopt any policy or rule, written or unwritten, that requires all classified employees, or any individual classification, or group of classifications of employees transferring to its district to waive any part or all benefits which they may be entitled to have transferred in accordance with this section.

This section shall apply to community college districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 326, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

88203.

(a) (1) All probationary or permanent employees who are part of the classified service shall be entitled to the following paid holidays if they are in a paid status during any portion of the working day immediately preceding or succeeding the holiday:

(A) January 1.

(B) February 12 known as “Lincoln Day.”

(C) The third Monday in February known as “Washington Day.”

(D) The last Monday in May known as “Memorial Day.”

(E) July 4.

(F) The first Monday in September known as “Labor Day.”

(G) November 11 known as “Veterans Day.”

(H) That Thursday in November proclaimed by the President as “Thanksgiving Day.”

(I) December 25.

(J) Every day appointed by the President, or the Governor of this state, as provided for in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 79020 for a public fast, thanksgiving, or holiday.

(K) Any day declared a holiday under Section 1318 for classified or academic employees.

(2) College recesses during the Christmas and Easter periods shall not be considered holidays for classified employees who are normally required to work
 during that period; provided, however, that this shall not be construed as affecting vacation rights specified in this section.

(3) For purposes of this section, “appointed by the President” includes the President signing into law legislation that creates a nationwide federal holiday, including the legal public holidays listed in subsection (a) of Section 6103 of Title 5 of the United States Code, but does not include Columbus Day. This definition is declaratory of existing law.

(b) Regular employees of the community college district who are not normally assigned to duty during the community college holidays of December 25 and January 1 shall be paid for those two holidays if they were in a paid status during any portion of the working day of their normal assignment immediately preceding or succeeding the holiday period.

(c) When a holiday listed in this section falls on a Sunday, the following Monday shall be deemed to be the holiday in lieu of the day observed. When a holiday listed in this section falls on a Saturday, the preceding Friday shall be deemed to be the holiday in lieu of the day observed. When a classified employee is required to work on any of the holidays listed in this section, they shall be paid compensation, or given compensating time off, for such work, in addition to the regular pay received for the holiday, at the rate of time and one-half their regular rate of pay.

(d) Article 3 (commencing with Section 79020) of Chapter 8 of Part 48 shall not be construed to in any way limit this section, nor shall anything in this section be construed to prohibit the governing board of a community college district from adopting separate work schedules for the academic and the classified services, or from providing holiday pay for employees
 who have not been in paid status on the days specified in this section. Notwithstanding the adoption of separate work schedules for the academic and the classified services, on any schoolday during which students would otherwise have been in attendance, but are not and for which faculty receive regular pay, classified personnel shall also receive regular pay whether or not they are required to report for duty that day.

(e) In addition to the other paid holidays specified in this section, the classified service may be entitled to a paid holiday on March 31 known as “Cesar Chavez Day,” a paid holiday on April 24 known as “Genocide Remembrance Day,” a paid holiday on the 15th day of the month of Kartik in the Hindu lunar calendar of each year, known as “Diwali,” and a paid holiday on the fourth Friday in September known as “Native American Day,” if they are in a paid status during any portion of the working day immediately preceding or succeeding
 the holiday, if the governing board of the community college district, pursuant to a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, agrees to the paid holiday.

(f) In lieu of a paid holiday on February 12, Lincoln Day, or the third Monday in February, Washington Day, as specified in this section, the classified service shall be entitled to a paid holiday on the date corresponding to the Lunar New Year holiday selected pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 79020, if they are in a paid status during any portion of the working day immediately preceding or succeeding the Lunar New Year holiday, if the governing board of the community college district, pursuant to a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, agrees to the replacement holiday pursuant to
 subdivision (n) of Section 79020.

(g) This section shall apply to community college districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 358, Sec. 6.   (AB 268)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

88204.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 88203, if a community college district establishes a position or class of positions for which employees are required to work exclusively on weekends and holidays, and for which a special salary rate is established that recognizes the exclusive weekend and holiday peculiarity, the employees and positions may be exempted, by the personnel commission, where applicable, or the governing board from the benefits of Section 88203. No governing board may create a position or a class of positions, under this section, to avoid payment of overtime.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88205.

Prior to July 1 of any college year, the governing board of any community college district may designate other days during that year as the holidays to which classified employees are entitled in lieu of the holidays on February 12 known as “Lincoln Day,” the third Monday in February known as “Washington Day,” the last Monday in May known as “Memorial Day,” or November 11 known as “Veterans Day” as specified in Section 88203, if the designated days provide for at least a three-day weekend. Classified employees shall be required to work on the regular holiday for which another day is designated pursuant to this section, and for work of eight hours or less, shall be paid compensation at their regular rate of pay.

If any classified employee would be entitled to the regular paid holiday but would not be in a paid status during any portion of the working day immediately preceding or succeeding the day so designated in lieu of that holiday and therefore would not be entitled to a day in lieu of the holiday, he or she shall be entitled to the regular holiday; however, if the employee is required to work on that holiday, he or she shall be paid compensation at the rate of time and one-half of his or her regular rate of pay in addition to the regular pay received for the holiday.

This section shall not be construed to authorize the maintenance of colleges on holidays other than as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 79020) of Chapter 8 of Part 48.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 238.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88205.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the governing board of a community college district does not designate September 9 known as “Admission Day” as a paid holiday for classified employees, the district shall provide a substitute holiday for those employees. The substitute holiday shall be provided as specified in Section 88205.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 239.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88206.

Any community college district that requires any classified employee to work a workweek other than Monday through Friday, or if the classified employee consents to a workweek including Saturday or Sunday, or both, and as a result thereof the employee loses a holiday to which he or she would otherwise be entitled, shall provide a substitute holiday for the employee, or provide compensation in the amount to which the employee would have been entitled had the holiday fallen within his or her normal work schedule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 240.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88207.

(a) A contract or regular employee may, at the employee’s election, use any days of absence for illness or injury earned pursuant to Section 88191 in cases of personal necessity, including any of the following:

(1) Death of a member of the employee’s immediate family when additional leave is required beyond that provided both in Section 88194 and as a right by the governing board.

(2) Accident involving the person or property of the employee or of a member of his or her immediate family.

(3) Appearance in any court or before any administrative tribunal as a litigant, party, or witness under subpoena or any order made with jurisdiction.

(4) Any other reasons that the governing board may prescribe.

(b) The governing board of each community college district shall adopt rules and regulations requiring and prescribing the manner of proof of personal necessity for the purpose of this section. The adopted rules and regulations may not require an employee to secure advance permission for leave taken for the purposes specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a). Earned leave in excess of seven days may not be used in any college year for the purposes enumerated in this section except if either of the following conditions exist:

(1) A maximum number of days in excess of seven is specified for that purpose in an agreement between the exclusive representative of the employees and the community college district.

(2) If there is no exclusive representative of the employees, the governing board of the community college district, by resolution, adopts a policy allowing earned leave in excess of seven days to be used in any school year for the purposes enumerated in this section.

(c) Authorized necessity leave shall be deducted from sick leave earned under the exemption of Section 88191.

(d) For purposes of this section, “immediate family” has the same meaning as in Section 88194.

(e) This section applies to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) and to community college districts that may be exempted from Section 88191.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 843, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

88207.5.

(a) A contract or regular employee may use up to 30 days of leave in a school year, less any days of leave authorized pursuant to Section 88207, in either of the following circumstances:

(1) A biological parent may use leave pursuant to this section within the first year of his or her infant’s birth.

(2) A nonbiological parent may use leave pursuant to this section within the first year of legally adopting a child.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect before January 1, 2015, the provisions of this section do not
 apply to the public employer and public employees subject to that agreement until the expiration or renewal of the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 133.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

88209.

The Director of Employment Development is the administrator of the system of unemployment insurance, as provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 821) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

88210.

(a) (1) The governing board of a community college district shall grant to a classified employee, upon request, a leave of absence without loss of compensation for the purpose of enabling the employee to serve as an elected officer of a local community college district public employee organization, or of a statewide or national public employee organization with which the local organization is affiliated.

(2) The leave shall include, but is not limited to, absence for purposes of attendance by the employee at periodic, stated, special, or regular meetings of the body of the organization on which the employee serves as an officer. Compensation during the leave shall include
 retirement fund contributions required of the community college district employer. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave of absence and shall pay member contributions as prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 20677 of the Government Code.

(b) Upon request of a recognized local community college district public employee organization, or a statewide or national public employee organization with which the local organization is affiliated, the governing board of a community college district shall grant a leave of absence, without loss of compensation, to a reasonable number of unelected classified employees for the purpose of enabling an employee to attend important organizational activities authorized by the public employee organization. Compensation during the leave shall include retirement fund contributions
 required of the community college district as employer. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave of absence and shall pay member contributions as prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 20677 of the Government Code.

(c) Following the community college district’s payment of the employee for the leave of absence, the community college district shall be reimbursed by the employee organization of which the employee is an elected officer or an unelected member for all compensation paid the employee on account of the leave. Reimbursement by the employee organization shall be made within 10 days after its receipt of the community college district’s certification of payment of compensation to the employee.

(d) The leave of absence without loss of compensation provided for
 by this section is in addition to the released time without loss of compensation granted to representatives of an exclusive representative by subdivision (c) of Section 3543.1 of the Government Code. The leave provided under this section shall be in addition to any leave to which public employees may be entitled by other laws or by a memorandum of understanding or collective bargaining agreement.

(e) The representing employee organization shall provide reasonable notification to the employer requesting a leave of absence without loss of compensation pursuant to subdivision (a).

(f) (1) A classified employee who after August 31, 1987, was absent on account of elected-officer service, shall
 receive full service credit in the Public Employees’ Retirement System, provided that both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The employee makes a written request to the employer for a leave of absence for the period of the elected-officer service.

(B) The employee organization of which the employee is an elected officer pays to the employee’s community college district an amount equal to
 the required Public Employees’ Retirement System member and employer retirement contributions, as prescribed by this section.

(2) The community college district, following the written request and payment, shall transmit the amount received to the Public Employees’ Retirement System, informing it of the period of the employee’s leave of absence. The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall credit the employee with all service credit earned for the period of the elected-officer leave of absence.

(3) If the employee has been compensated by the community college district for the period of the service, then, as a condition to the employee’s entitlement to service credit for the period, the community college district shall be reimbursed by the employee organization for the amount of
 the compensation.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, this section shall apply retroactively to all service as an elected officer in a public employee organization occurring after August 31, 1987.

(h) This section shall not apply to an employee who is subject to a collective bargaining agreement that expressly provides for a leave of absence without loss of compensation for participation in authorized activities as an elected officer or an unelected member of the public employee organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 539, Sec. 5.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Retraining and Study [88220. - 88227.]

88220.

In enacting this article the Legislature recognizes that technological and other changes are occurring which may displace otherwise desirable classified employees in the public school systems of the state. The Legislature intends that the enactment of this article will encourage classified employees to prepare themselves for the changes that are occurring and will also encourage governing boards to utilize the article to further study and retraining by classified personnel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88221.

The governing board of any community college district may grant any classified employee a leave of absence not to exceed one year for the purpose of permitting study by the employee or for the purpose of retraining the employee to meet changing conditions within the district.

The governing board may provide that such a leave of absence shall be taken in separate six-month periods or in any other appropriate periods, rather than for a continuous one-year period; provided, that the separate periods of leave of absence shall be commenced and completed within a three-year period. Any period of service by the individual intervening between the authorized separate periods shall comprise a part of the service required for a subsequent leave of absence for study or retraining purposes.

In community college districts operating under the merit system, such leaves of absence shall be granted in accordance with rules established by the personnel commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88222.

No leave of absence shall be granted under this article to any employee for study purposes who has not rendered service to the district for at least seven consecutive years, or for retraining purposes who has not rendered service to the district for at least three consecutive years preceding the granting of the leave, and no more than one such leave of absence shall be granted in each seven- or three-year period, respectively. The governing board, or personnel commission in merit system districts, may prescribe standards of service which shall entitle the employee to the leave of absence.
